Illinois, session 104th, HB3385.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Mental Health Early Action on Campus Act is 5amended by changing Sections 30 and 40 as follows: 6    (110 ILCS 58/30)7    Sec. 30. Training. 8    (a) The board of trustees of each public college or 9university must designate an expert panel to develop and 10implement policies and procedures that (i) advise students, 11faculty, and staff on the proper procedures for identifying 12and addressing the needs of students exhibiting symptoms of 13mental health conditions, (ii) promote understanding of the 14rules of Section 504 of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973 15and the federal Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 to 16increase knowledge and understanding of student protections 17under the law, and (iii) provide training if appropriate.18    The expert panel shall be comprised of at least 2 19administrators, 2 members of faculty, and one mental health 20professional. 21    (b) The Technical Assistance Center under Section 45 shall 22set initial standards for policies and procedures referenced 23in subsection (a) to ensure statewide consistency.   HB3385 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 09964 LNS 20034 b1    (c) All resident assistants in a student housing facility, 2advisors, and campus security of a public college or 3university must participate in a national Mental Health First 4Aid training course or a similar program prior to the 5commencement of their duties. Training must include the 6policies and procedures developed by the public college or 7university referenced under subsection (a). 8(Source: P.A. 101-251, eff. 7-1-20.) 9    (110 ILCS 58/40)10    Sec. 40. Local partnerships. 11    (a) Each public college or university must form strategic 12partnerships with local mental health service providers to 13improve overall campus mental wellness and augment on-campus 14capacity. The strategic partnerships must include linkage 15agreements with off-campus mental health service providers 16that establish a foundation for referrals for students when 17needs cannot be met on campus due to capacity or preference of 18the student. The strategic partnerships must also include (i) 19avenues for on-campus and off-campus mental health service 20providers to increase visibility to students via marketing and 21outreach, (ii) opportunities to engage the student body 22through student outreach initiatives like mindfulness 23workshops or campus-wide wellness fairs, and (iii) 24opportunities to support awareness and training requirements 25under this Act.  HB3385 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 09964 LNS 20034 b1    (b) Through a combination of on-campus capacity, 2off-campus linkage agreements with mental health service 3providers, and contracted telehealth therapy services, each 4public college or university shall attempt to meet a benchmark 5ratio of one clinical, non-student staff member to 1,250 6students. Each public college or university shall provide at 7least 3 licensed mental health professionals or, if the 8benchmark ratio falls under 3, at least the number of licensed 9mental health professionals required by the benchmark ratio. 10The mental health professional may be provided either in (i) a 11part-time, on-campus capacity or (ii) a full-time, on- or 12off-campus capacity. Service hours for the mental health 13professionals should be informed by campus utilization data 14and may include in-person and telehealth modalities to ensure 15access to the mental health professionals. If linkage 16agreements are used, the agreements must include the capacity 17of students providers are expected to serve within the agency. 18Two years after the effective date of this Act, and once every 195 years thereafter, the Technical Assistance Center developed 20under Section 45 must propose to the General Assembly an 21updated ratio based on actual ratios in this State and any new 22information related to appropriate benchmarks for 23clinician-to-student ratios. The updated benchmark must 24represent a ratio of no less than one clinical, non-student 25staff member to 1,250 students.26    (c) Each public college or university must work with local   HB3385 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 09964 LNS 20034 b1resources, such as on-campus mental health counseling centers 2or wellness centers, local mental health service providers, or 3non-providers, such as affiliates of the National Alliance on 4Mental Illness, and any other resources to meet the awareness 5and training requirements under Sections 25 and 30 of this 6Act. 7(Source: P.A. 101-251, eff. 7-1-20.)